Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2852
Examinations; grade.

Every applicant for licensure as a pharmacist shall attain a passing grade to be determined by the board in an examination in pharmacy and in an examination in jurisprudence of pharmacy. The jurisprudence examination may occur at a time, before or after graduation, as determined by the accredited pharmacy program attended by the applicant.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 948;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 54;

Laws 2026, LB912, § 20.
April 15, 2026